Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. Amendments to Wyoming Constitution

§ 22-20-101.
Ratification of proposed amendment or new constitution.

A proposed amendment to the constitution of the state of Wyoming submitted by a two-thirds vote of each of the houses of the state legislature or a proposed new constitution submitted by a constitutional convention may be ratified by a majority of the electors voting at the next general election. Voting on a proposed amendment or new constitution shall be regulated by general election laws.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-276.

Cited

in

Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 22-20-102.
Transmittal to secretary of state; numbering and endorsement; ballot statement.

A proposed amendment shall be transmitted to the office of the secretary of state by the house in which it originates or by a constitutional convention. The secretary of state shall letter each proposed amendment serially in the order received from the legislature or convention and shall endorse upon a proposed amendment, a brief statement of the purpose of the amendment. If the bill proposing the amendment provides this statement, it shall be adopted by the secretary of state.

The letter and statement endorsed on a proposed amendment are part of the amendment for purposes of reference in submitting the amendment to the electors and shall constitute the ballot statement of the amendment.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-277; Laws 1995, ch. 115, § 1.

§ 22-20-103.
Transmittal to county clerk; posting.

The secretary of state shall mail a certified copy of a proposed amendment and statement of its purpose filed in his office to each county clerk not less than sixty (60) days prior to the election at which the proposed amendment is submitted to the electors. The county clerk shall immediately post in his office the copy of a proposed amendment and statement of its purpose received from the secretary of state. The copy shall remain posted until after the election at which the amendment is submitted to the vote of the electors.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-278; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1990, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-20-104.
Publication by secretary of state; supplemental publication by clerk.

The secretary of state shall publish each proposed amendment and a notice that it will be submitted to the electors at the next general election, once a week for at least twelve (12) consecutive weeks prior to the election in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county and, if possible, once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks within thirty (30) days prior to the election in one (1) other newspaper of general circulation in each county.

The clerk may supplement publication thereof by radio or television broadcasts or both. The broadcasts shall identify the proposed amendment or other question, by letter and statement of purpose as prescribed by law, and shall state the name of the newspaper in which the published notice will appear and the date on which it will appear.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-279; Laws 1995, ch. 115, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-20-105.
Pamphlet.

The secretary of state shall print a reasonable number of pamphlets containing every proposed amendment and provide a copy of the pamphlet upon request to any person or organization.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-280; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-20-106.
Publication expense.

The expense of publication of notice of proposed amendments and voter pamphlets shall be paid out of the general fund of the state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-281.

§ 22-20-107.
Statement of purpose on ballot.

The county clerk shall print on the official nonpartisan general election ballot for the next general election the statement of purpose of each proposed amendment certified to him by the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-282.

§ 22-20-108.
Proclamation of adoption; effective date.

The governor shall issue a proclamation of adoption not later than ten (10) days after the adoption of each proposed amendment has been officially certified by the state canvassing board. A proposed amendment is effective on the date it is proclaimed adopted by the governor.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-283.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-20-109.
Publication in session laws.

Each constitutional amendment proposed by the legislature, and if possible each proposed by a constitutional convention, and each constitutional amendment adopted by the vote of the people, shall be published in the next session laws.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-284.